Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB674.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 216.315 is amended to read as follows:
The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, in addition to his or
her other duties, act as secretary of hospital districts, and is vested with jurisdiction,
power, and authority, when the conditions set forth in KRS 216.317 exist, to establish a
hospital district within a medical service area as established by the secretary of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/14/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed